Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Adult Protection
71-6-107. Provision of protective services without the consent of the adult.

If the department determines that an adult who is in need of protective services is in imminent danger if that adult does not receive protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services, then the department may file a complaint with the court for an order authorizing the provision of protective services necessary to prevent imminent danger of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life. The judge or chancellor shall hear the complaint ahead of any other business then pending in court or in chambers. This order may include the designation of an individual or organization to be responsible for the personal welfare of the adult and for consenting to protective services in the adult's behalf. The complaint must allege specific facts sufficient to show that the adult is in imminent danger if the adult does not receive protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services. Prior to filing a complaint with the court for an order authorizing removal of an adult from that adult's chosen place of residence, the department shall make reasonable efforts to exhaust all practical alternatives to the removal of such adult from such place of residence.

In situations where the department must present a petition for emergency removal of an adult in imminent danger and a chancellor or circuit judge is unavailable, the department may present petitions to judicial officers with general sessions jurisdiction. Further proceedings shall be conducted in chancery or circuit court.

For the purposes of this section, “sexual abuse,” as defined in this chapter, shall provide grounds for the department to obtain custody of an adult who lacks capacity to consent when such abuse relates to sexual activity or contact.

The judge or chancellor or the general sessions court judge, prior to entering the order, must find that the adult is in imminent danger if the adult does not receive protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services.

Within seven (7) days of entering an order pursuant to this section, or for good cause shown, then up to fifteen (15) days, the court shall hold a hearing on the merits. If such a hearing is not held within such time, the order authorizing the provision of protective services shall be dissolved.

The adult alleged to be in need of protective services and any person to whom the adult is lawfully married, if known and reasonably available, must be served with a copy of the complaint at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the hearing, unless for good cause shown, a shorter time is allowed by the court. The adult and the adult's spouse have a right to be present and represented by counsel at the hearing. Failure to serve a copy of the complaint on a lawful spouse of the adult, if the spouse is not known or is not reasonably available as determined by the court, shall not prevent the provision of protective services, as ordered by the court, that may be necessary to prevent the adult from suffering imminent harm.

If the adult alleged to be in need of protective services is indigent or, in the determination of the judge or chancellor, lacks capacity to waive the right to counsel, then the court shall appoint counsel for the adult alleged to be in need of protective services.

If the adult alleged to be in need of protective services is indigent, court costs and the cost of representation of the adult shall be borne by the state; otherwise, the costs shall be borne by the adult. The state shall not be liable for the cost of counsel or court costs for the spouse of the adult; provided, however, that if the court finds that the department or an agency acting under subdivision (a)(7) has, without good cause, failed to serve a copy of the complaint on the lawful spouse of the adult, the court may assess attorneys fees for the spouse of the adult and court costs to the department or agency acting under subdivision (a)(7) not to exceed a total of two thousand dollars ($2,000); provided further, however, that the court may exceed the two thousand dollar ($2,000) limit upon making a specific finding of fact that the failure of the department or an agency to serve the complaint resulted in financial hardship upon the spouse or adult in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and that the interests of justice require that the limit be exceeded in the particular case.

If a court determines that appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary, and if the adult is indigent, the cost for the guardian ad litem shall be borne by the state; otherwise the costs shall be borne by the adult.

Protective services necessary to prevent imminent danger of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life authorized by order pursuant to this section may include, but are not limited to, taking the adult into physical custody in the home, a medical or nursing care facility, or, if available, an alternative living arrangement exclusive of a developmental center operated by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities; provided, that the court finds that such custody is for the purpose of medical examination and treatment necessary to prevent imminent danger of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life or protection from abuse or neglect necessary to prevent imminent danger of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life, and that the court specifically authorizes such custody in its order. In determining what specific custodial authority to grant under this section, the court shall consider whether the imminent danger of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life is relatively mild or severe and authorize such custody as is appropriate under the circumstances. The department shall review the decree at least annually to determine whether the prerequisites for custody still exist.

Within a reasonable period of time after an adult is taken into physical custody and placed other than in a medical or nursing care facility, the department shall cause an appropriate examination to be made of the adult to determine the cause or causes resulting in the adult's lack of capacity to consent, if such determination had not been made at the time of the final hearing.

In the event that the adult has sufficient resources to defray the costs of a medical or nursing care facility, or an appropriate alternative living arrangement, as decreed by the court pursuant to this subsection (a), and that without such resources the adult would be unable to enter such facility or alternative living arrangement, then the court may appoint a temporary guardian for such period as necessary to secure and disburse the adult's resources for that purpose, but for no longer than six (6) months from the entry of the order authorizing provision of protective services. However, the court in its discretion may extend such period for a period no longer than an additional six (6) months. The guardian appointed pursuant hereto shall file an accounting with the court as to the resources used.

The court in its order may authorize the temporary guardian to exercise a limited power of attorney over any accounts the adult has in a bank, credit union, or other financial institution. The temporary guardian so designated shall deliver a copy of the order of the court to the financial institution prior to taking any action with regard to the accounts. The limited power of attorney shall authorize the temporary guardian to withdraw money from or freeze or unfreeze the account.

Concurrent with the order of the court appointing a temporary guardian, the court shall issue a subpoena directed to the financial institution in compliance with the Financial Records Privacy Act, compiled in title 45, chapter 10, requesting the names of any co-owner or additional authorized signatories on the accounts, unless the temporary guardian has actual knowledge of any co-owners or additional authorized signatories. Upon receipt of the response to the subpoena, or upon actual knowledge of the co-owners or additional authorized signatories, the temporary guardian shall send a copy of the order to any person who is a co-owner of or authorized signatory on the deposit account within ten (10) days of receiving the names of the co-owners or signatories. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(6)(C) shall preclude the temporary guardian from making immediate expenditures from the accounts of the adult necessary to provide protective services for the adult in imminent danger, as defined in this part, pending the response by the co-owners or other signatories to the accounts.

If the court finds that the temporary guardian has, without good cause, failed to provide a copy of the order under this subdivision (a)(6) to the co-owner or additional authorized signatory on the deposit account, the court may assess attorneys' fees for the benefit of the co-owner or additional authorized signatory or court costs associated with the failure of the department or the temporary guardian; provided, that the fees and court costs shall not exceed a total of two thousand dollars ($2,000); provided, further, however, that the court may exceed the two thousand dollar ($2,000) limit upon making a specific finding of fact that the failure of the department or an agency to serve the complaint resulted in financial hardship upon the spouse or adult in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and that the interests of justice require that the limit be exceeded in the particular case.

If the department refuses to exercise the powers granted to it by subdivision (a)(1), any private nonprofit agency representing disabled adults may proceed under subdivision (1), after giving notice to the department of intent to do so. If an order authorizing the provision of protective services results, the department's responsibilities are the same as they would have been if the department had sought the order. If the court finds that an order authorizing the provision of protected services is not warranted, any agency proceeding under this subdivision (a)(7) will be responsible for the cost of the court-appointed attorney representing the individual for whom protective services were sought as well as court costs.

If the department determines that an adult is in need of protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services, then the department may petition the judge or chancellor for a hearing. The complaint must allege specific facts sufficient to show that the adult is in need of protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services.

The adult alleged to be in need of protective services and any person to whom the adult is lawfully married, if known and reasonably available, must be served with a copy of the complaint at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing, unless for good cause shown, a shorter time is allowed by the court. The adult and the adult's spouse have a right to be present and represented by counsel at the hearing. Failure to serve a copy of the complaint on a lawful spouse of the adult, if the spouse is not known or is not reasonably available as determined by the court, shall not prevent the provision of protective services to the adult, as ordered by the court.

If the adult alleged to be in need of protective services is indigent or, in the determination of the judge or chancellor, lacks capacity to waive the right to counsel, then the court shall appoint counsel for the adult alleged to be in need of protective services.

If the adult alleged to be in need of protective services is indigent, court costs and the cost of representation of the adult shall be borne by the state; otherwise the costs shall be borne by the adult. The state shall not be liable for the costs of counsel or court costs for the spouse of the adult; provided, however, if the court finds that the department or an agency acting under subdivision (7) has, without good cause, failed to serve a copy of the complaint on the lawful spouse of the adult, the court may assess attorneys fees for the spouse of the adult and court costs to the department or agency acting under subdivision (7) not to exceed a total of two thousand dollars ($2,000); provided, however, that the court may exceed the two thousand dollar ($2,000) limit upon making a specific finding of fact that the failure of the department or an agency to serve the complaint resulted in financial hardship upon the spouse or adult in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and that the interests of justice require that the limit be exceeded in the particular case.

If a court determines that appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary, and if the adult is indigent, the cost for the guardian ad litem shall be borne by the state; otherwise the costs shall be borne by the adult.

If the judge or chancellor finds that the adult is in need of protective services and lacks capacity to consent to protective services, then the judge or chancellor may enter a decree authorizing the provision of protective services. This decree may include the designation of an individual or organization to be responsible for the personal welfare of the adult and for consenting to protective services in the adult's behalf.

An individual or organization appointed pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) to be responsible for the personal welfare of the adult and for consenting to protective services in the adult's behalf or to serve as temporary guardian shall have only specific authority as the court shall provide in its order. Such authority shall be limited to the authority to consent to specified protective services, including medical care if ordered, and if ordered pursuant to subsection (a), may arrange for, and consent to, appropriate custodial care and gain access to and disburse the adult's resources. If the adult is in need of a person to manage the adult's affairs or to have other responsibilities not addressed in this section, the procedures and requirements for appointment of a conservator pursuant to title 34, chapter 1 or 3, must be followed. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the department to initiate proceedings for the appointment of a conservator or a temporary guardian or to accept such appointment if proceedings are instituted or to initiate proceedings under title 34, chapter 1 or 3.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2607; Acts 1980, ch. 513, § 7; 1986, ch. 630, §§ 9-14; 1986, ch. 892, § 1; T.C.A., §14-25-107; Acts 1995, ch. 486, §§ 2-5, 7, 10-13, 15, 19; 1999, ch. 247, § 3; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2008, ch. 887, §§ 1-3; 2008, ch. 1005, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 143.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Right of elderly person or disabled adult to recover for abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation, or theft, §71-6-120.

Rules and regulations, reports of abuse or neglect, investigation, providing protective services, consent of adult, duties of other agencies, §71-6-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, §§ 5, 7.

71-6-108. Prohibitions.

No adult may be adjudicated incompetent or committed to a mental institution under this part.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2608, 14-25-108.

71-6-109. Payment for protective services.

If the department determines that the adult is financially capable of paying for the protective services received, according to standards to be set by the department, the adult shall reimburse the state for the cost of providing the protective services. If the department determines that the adult is not financially capable of paying for the protective services received, the state shall bear the cost of providing the protective services. Otherwise, the department may recover such cost from the adult in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2609, 14-25-109.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-6-110. Violation of duty to report.

Any person who fails to make reasonable efforts to make a report required by this chapter or §39-15-509(a) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2610; Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 15; T.C.A., §14-25-110; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2018, ch. 1050, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to acts committed on or after January 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-6-111. Authority and responsibility of department.

It is the legislative intent that the protective services set out in this part be provided and that the department have present authority to provide or to arrange for the provision of the same. However, the provision of the services is subject to budgetary limitations and the availability of funds appropriated for the general provision of protective services to all persons entitled to services.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2611, 14-25-111.

Law Reviews.

The Incompetent's Right to Refuse Life-Sustaining Treatment (Mary E. McCroskey), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 145 (1983).

71-6-112. Funding.

The cost of the administration of this part and the provision of the services hereby authorized shall be limited to the amount of funds specifically appropriated for such purposes by the general assembly.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2612, 14-25-112.

71-6-113. Cooperation by other departments — Specialized care.

It is the legislative intent that the departments of mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and health, or their successor agencies, shall assist the department of human services with providing the services required under this part.

When the department of human services is unable to find a resource for any person in need of protective services who, because of mental or physical illness, intellectual disability or developmental disabilities, is in need of specialized care or medical treatment, the departments of mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and health, or their successor agencies, shall, based upon available resources, give priority to the person for appropriate placement or treatment if the person is eligible for placement.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 2; T.C.A., § 14-2613; Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 16; T.C.A., §14-25-113; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2009, ch. 212, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 144, 145; 2011, ch. 158, § 41; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-6-114. Jurisdiction and venue.

The circuit, general sessions, and chancery courts have jurisdiction of proceedings arising under this part. Probate courts in counties having a population of not less than seven hundred seventy-five thousand (775,000) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery courts.

A proceeding under this part may be commenced in the county where the adult resides or is physically present.

Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 4; T.C.A., §14-25-114; Acts 1995, ch. 486, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

71-6-115. Cooperation by law enforcement officials.

It is the legislative intent that law enforcement officials shall cooperate with the department of human services in providing protective services under this part. Further, when the department is unable to return an adult to physical custody who voluntarily leaves such custody, law enforcement officials shall assist in returning the adult to such physical custody and shall give priority in providing such assistance.

Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 17; T.C.A., §14-25-115.

71-6-116. Motion for review of court decree.

Either party to a proceeding under this part, or any interested person on behalf of the adult subject to such a proceeding, may file a motion for review of the decree of the court at any time.

Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 17; T.C.A., §14-25-116.

71-6-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 961, § 2, as amended by Acts 2015, ch. 203, § 1, provided that: “(a) There is created the elder abuse task force.

“(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:

“(1) One (1) member of the senate appointed by the speaker of the senate;

“(2) One (1) member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

“(3) The executive director of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability or the director's designee;

“(4) The commissioner of human services or the commissioner's designee with knowledge of the responsibilities of the adult protective services program;

“(5) The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee;

“(6) The commissioner of financial institutions or the commissioner's designee;

“(7) The commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

“(8) A representative of the Disability Law and Advocacy Center of Tennessee appointed by the center's executive director;

“(9) A district attorney general selected by the district attorneys general conference; and

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the director's designee.

“(c)(1) The task force shall:

“(A) Assess the current status of elders and other vulnerable adults covered by the Tennessee Adult Protection Act, compiled in Tennessee Code

Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 6, Part 1;

“(B) Examine the existing barriers, services and resources addressing the needs of these elder persons and vulnerable adults; and

“(C) Develop recommendations to address problems associated with the abuse of these elder persons and vulnerable adults.

“(2) The task force shall include an examination of the following in its assessment and recommendations:

“(A) A determination of the economic and human impact of the abuse of elder persons and vulnerable adults in Tennessee;

“(B) A review of the remedies to reduce the number of individuals suffering such abuse;

“(C) Legislative remedies for consideration in the 1 09th general assembly; and

“(D) Needed state policies or responses, including directions for the provision of clear and coordinated services and support to protect and assist such persons.

“(d)(1) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation or reimbursement for any expenses incurred while participating in the business of the task force.

“(2) All legislative members of the task force shall remain members of the task force until the task force reports its findings and recommendations to the general assembly.

“(e) The selection of members of the task force shall strive to be inclusive and to reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban and rural, and economic diversity of the state.

“(f) The member of the general assembly with the most seniority in the general assembly shall call the first meeting of the task force at which time the members shall elect a chair and vice-chair.

“(g) The commission on aging and disability shall provide necessary administrative support for the task force. The chair of the task force may call on appropriate state agencies for reasonable assistance in the work of the task force.

“(h) The task force shall hold public meetings and utilize technological means, such as webcasts, to gather feedback on the recommendations from the general public and from persons and families affected by poverty.

“(i) The task force shall submit its findings and recommendations to the governor and the general assembly in the form of a state plan to combat the abuse of elder persons and other vulnerable adults no later than January 15, 2016, at which time the task force shall terminate and stand dissolved and discharged from any further duties.”

Acts 2015, ch. 398, § 2 provided that the act, which added (d), shall apply to acts occurring on or after July 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 466, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to acts committed on or after January 1, 2019.

Section 71-6-117 concerning registry and fines for offense of abuse of adult is repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 474, § 16, effective January 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, ch. 474, 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2019.”

71-6-118. Confidentiality of information, reports and proceedings — Penalties.

The identity of a person who reports abuse, neglect, or exploitation, as those terms are defined in § 71-6-102, as required under this part, is confidential and may not be revealed except as otherwise provided in this section or upon an order by a court with jurisdiction under this part for good cause shown.

The identity of a person who makes a report pursuant to § 39-15-509(a), is confidential and may not be revealed except as otherwise provided in this section or upon an order by a court with jurisdiction under this part for good cause shown.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part or title 39, to disclose, receive, make use of, authorize, or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list or the name of, or any information concerning, persons receiving services pursuant to this part, or any information concerning a report or investigation of a report made confidential pursuant to subsection (a), directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department of human services or divisions thereof acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

When necessary to protect elderly or vulnerable adults in a healthcare facility licensed by any state agency, the information, reports, and investigations described in subsection (b) may be disclosed to any agency providing licensing or regulation for that facility; however, the information, reports, and investigations shall retain the protection of subsection (b) when disclosed to such agency and may not be disclosed to, or used by, any other person.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), adult protective services:

May report to law enforcement or public health authorities any information from its investigations or records regarding illness, disease, injuries, or any offense for which reports are made confidential under subsection (a) obtained in the course of an investigation;

Shall provide to the district attorney general a complete and unredacted copy of adult protective services' entire investigative file upon the commencement of a criminal prosecution for alleged conduct involving an elderly or vulnerable adult victim obtained in the course of an investigation; however, the identity of the person who reported the alleged conduct shall only be provided pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(C) and subsection (d); and

Shall provide to the district attorney general the identity of the person reporting alleged conduct involving an elderly or vulnerable adult victim upon the return of a criminal indictment or presentment arising from the report and pursuant to written request by the district attorney and entry of a protective order preventing further release of the identity of the person reporting for any purpose other than criminal prosecution.

As used in this subsection (c), “elderly or vulnerable adult” includes an adult, as defined in § 71-6-102, an elderly adult, as defined in § 39-15-501, and a vulnerable adult, as defined in § 39-15-501.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the district attorney general from complying with the continuing duty to disclose evidence under the rules of discovery in a criminal prosecution.

A knowing violation of subsection (a) or (b) or subdivision (c)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 17; T.C.A., §14-25-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2008, ch. 1005, §§ 4, 5; 2018, ch. 1050, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to acts committed on or after January 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-6-119. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to acts committed on or after January 1, 2019.

Section 71-6-119 concerning elements of offense and penalties for physical abuse of adult is repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 474, § 16, effective January 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, ch. 474, 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2019.”

71-6-120. Right of elderly person or disabled adult to recover for abuse or neglect, sexual abuse, exploitation, or theft.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Capacity to consent” means the mental ability to make a rational decision, which includes the ability to perceive, appreciate all relevant facts and to reach a rational judgment upon such facts; or to make and carry out reasonable decisions concerning the person or the person's resources; or to protect the person from neglect, or hazardous or abusive situations without assistance;

“Disabled adult” means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and who meets one (1) of the following:

Has some impairment of body or mind that makes the person unfit to work at any substantially remunerative employment;

Lacks the capacity to consent;

Has been certified as permanently and totally disabled by an agency of this state or the United States that has the function of so classifying persons; or

Has been found to be incompetent by a court of proper jurisdiction; and

“Elderly person” or “elder” means a person who is sixty (60) years of age or older who has some mental or physical dysfunctioning, including any resulting from age.

In addition to other remedies provided by law, an elderly person or disabled adult in that person's own right, or by conservator or next friend, shall have a right of recovery in a civil action for compensatory damages for abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation as defined in this part or for theft of such person's or adult's money or property whether by fraud, deceit, coercion or otherwise. Such right of action against a wrongdoer shall not abate or be extinguished by the death of the elderly person or disabled adult, but shall pass as provided in § 20-5-106, unless the alleged wrongdoer is a family member, in which case the cause of action shall pass to the victim's personal representative.

Jurisdiction for such action shall be in the circuit or chancery court where the elderly person or disabled adult may reside or where the actions occurred.

Damages shall include compensatory damages and costs where it is proven that a defendant is liable for abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation as defined in this part or for theft of such elderly person's or disabled adult's money or property whether by fraud, deceit, coercion or otherwise. Costs shall include reasonable expenses. In addition, if it is proven upon clear and convincing evidence that abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation or theft resulted from intentional, fraudulent or malicious conduct by the defendant, a claimant shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorneys' fees. As part of any judgment, the court may declare void and unenforceable any marriage proven to have been entered into as part of a scheme to commit abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation as defined in this part or theft of such elderly person's or disabled adult's money or property whether by fraud, deceit, coercion or otherwise.

In addition to the damages described in (d), a defendant may also be found liable for punitive damages in accordance with applicable common law standards.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the department of human services to initiate any proceedings pursuant to this section or to act on behalf of any elderly person or disabled adult subject to this section.

This section shall not apply to a cause of action within the scope of title 29, chapter 26; such cause of action shall be governed solely by title 29, chapter 26.

A financial institution, officer, director, or employee of a financial institution, shall not be liable in any civil action brought by or on behalf of a disabled adult or elderly person for recovery of damages under this chapter, unless prior to such civil action, the financial institution, officer, director, or employee of a financial institution, shall have been convicted of a violation of § 39-15-502; provided, however, that this provision shall not apply to theft or conversion by an employee, officer or director of a financial institution or liability arising under other law.

Acts 1999, ch. 247, § 1; 2000, ch. 768, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 780, § 5; 2017, ch. 466, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 466, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act.”

Cross-References. Provision of protective services without consent of the adult, §71-6-107.

Rules and regulations, reports of abuse or neglect, investigation, providing protective services, consent of adult, duties of other agencies, §71-6-103.

Law Reviews.

Grandma's Pain: Should Claims of Under-Medication Arise in New Theories of Elder Abuse Statutes or Medical Malpractice Negligence? (Timothy McIntire), 40 No. 10 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2004).